Utah statutes.
20A-7-509.   Form of ballot -- Manner of voting.

(1)  The local clerk shall ensure that the number and ballot title are presented upon the official ballot with, immediately adjacent to them, the words "For" and "Against," each word presented with an adjacent square in which the elector may indicate his vote.

(2)  Electors desiring to vote in favor of enacting the law proposed by the initiative petition shall mark the square adjacent to the word "For," and those desiring to vote against enacting the law proposed by the initiative petition shall mark the square adjacent to the word "Against."



Amended by Chapter 202, 2009 General Session

